District of Columbia statutes.
44-113.01

Rulemaking by the Mayor.

The Mayor shall promulgate proposed rules where necessary to supplement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1301, 47 DCR 2647
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 13-127, the “Assisted Living Residence Regulatory Act of 2000”, see Mayor’s Order 2005-137, September 27, 2005 ( 53 DCR 155).